Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 260.407 is amended to read:
260.407. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, amounts received as con-
tributions by a candidate,  the principal campaign committee of a candidate or the principal cam-
paign committee of a holder of public office may be:
(A) Used to defray any expenses incurred in connection with the recipient’s  duties as a holder
of public office;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any  organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by a candidate, the principal  campaign committee of a
candidate for public office or the principal campaign committee of a holder  of public office may not
be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal  use other than to defray any expenses incurred in
connection with the person’s duties as a holder of public office or to repay to a  candidate any loan
the proceeds of which were used in connection with the candidate’s campaign;
(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any money award  as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil  penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS  183.310 or by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this paragraph  may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; [ or]
(C) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by the
candidate or public  official in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding or investigation that re-
lates to or arises from the course and scope of the duties of the person  as a candidate or public
official. Contributions described in  this paragraph may be used to pay legal expenses incurred by
the candidate  or public official in connection with a legal proceeding brought under ORS chapters
246 to 260, other than a proceeding brought under this section or ORS 260.409[ .]; or
(D) Used to make payments in connection with a  nondisclosure agreement relating to
workplace harassment. A nondisclosure agreement made in  violation of this subparagraph
is void and may not be enforced by a court of this state.
Enrolled Senate Bill 478 (SB 478-B) Page 1
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as contributions
by a political committee that is not a principal campaign committee may be:
(A) Used to repay to the political committee  any loan the proceeds of which were used in con-
nection with the campaign;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any  organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by the political committee may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use;
(B) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any money award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part  of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS 183.310 or by a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; [ or]
(C) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any  legal expenses incurred by a
treasurer or director of a political committee in any civil, criminal or other legal  proceeding or in-
vestigation that relates to or arises from the course and scope of the  duties of the person as a
treasurer or director. Contributions described  in this subsection may be used to pay legal expenses
incurred by a treasurer or director in connection with a legal proceeding brought  under ORS
chapters 246 to 260, other than a proceeding brought under this section or ORS 260.409[ .]; or
(D) Used to make payments in connection with a  nondisclosure agreement relating to
workplace harassment. A nondisclosure agreement made in  violation of this subparagraph
is void and may not be enforced by a court of this state.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as contributions
by a chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee may be:
(A) Used to repay to the chief petitioner any loan the proceeds of  which were used in con-
nection with the initiative, referendum or recall petition;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any  organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by a  chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee
may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use;
(B) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any money award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part  of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS 183.310 or by a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; [ or]
(C) Except as provided  in this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by a chief
petitioner or the treasurer  of a petition committee in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding
or investigation that relates to or arises from the course and scope of  the duties of the person as
a chief petitioner or treasurer.  Contributions described in this subsection may be used to pay legal
expenses incurred by a chief petitioner  or treasurer in connection with a legal proceeding brought
under ORS chapters  246 to 260, other than a proceeding brought under this section or ORS
260.409[.]; or
(D) Used to make payments  in connection with a nondisclosure agreement relating to
workplace harassment. A nondisclosure agreement  made in violation of this subparagraph
is void and may not be enforced by a court of this state.
(4) As used in this section:
Enrolled Senate Bill 478 (SB 478-B) Page 2
(a) “Contribution” and “expenditure” include a contribution or expenditure to or on  behalf of
an initiative, referendum or recall petition.
(b) “Funds donated” means all  funds, including but not limited to gifts, loans, advances, credits
or deposits of money that are  donated for the purpose of supporting the activities of a holder of
public office. “Funds donated” does not mean  funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly or
another similar public appropriating body or  personal funds of the office holder donated to an ac-
count containing only those personal funds.
(c) “Public office” does not include national or political party office.
(d) “Workplace  harassment” means conduct that constitutes discrimination prohibited
by ORS 659A.030, including conduct that constitutes sexual assault  as defined in ORS
181A.323.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 244.
SECTION 3. (1) A holder of public office or candidate may not:
(a) Use public moneys to make payments in connection with a nondisclosure agreement
relating to workplace harassment; or
(b) Use moneys received from a third party to  make payments in connection with a
nondisclosure agreement relating to workplace  harassment if the alleged harassment oc-
curred when the holder of public office  or candidate was acting as a holder of public office
or candidate.
(2) A nondisclosure agreement made in violation of this section is void  and may not be
enforced by a court of this state.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Payments in connection with a nondisclosure agreement” includes  any form of con-
sideration provided in exchange  for the silence of an individual on issues relating to
workplace harassment, including but not limited to:
(A) Money;
(B) Stock, personal property or other items with a resale value;
(C) Severance pay or benefits for an individual who resigned or  was fired from a place
of employment without cause;
(D) The promise of a positive reference  or assistance in obtaining future employment in
a position in which the individual’s salary is paid for with public moneys;
(E) The promise of a bonus payment of moneys in addition to the individual’s salary;
(F) Alternative work arrangements that have the effect of reducing the amount of  work
required to be performed by the  individual, or of removing the individual from the workplace;
or
(G) Any agreement that terminates the employment of the  individual and includes a
waiver of past or future claims against the holder of public office, the public body or any
public employee.
(b) “Public office” has the meaning given that term in ORS 260.005.
(c) “Workplace harassment”  means conduct that constitutes discrimination prohibited
by ORS 659A.030, including conduct that constitutes sexual assault  as defined in ORS
181A.323.
(4) This section does not prevent a holder of public official from using  public moneys to
make payments in connection with the receipt  of a legally required confidential or privileged
report of discrimination, sexual assault or harassment, including workplace harassment.
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 260.
SECTION 5. (1) In addition  to the requirements set forth in ORS 260.407, a political
committee or petition  committee may not provide any form of consideration in connection
with a nondisclosure agreement relating to workplace harassment.
(2) As used in this section:
Enrolled Senate Bill 478 (SB 478-B) Page 3
(a) “Consideration in connection with a nondisclosure agreement” includes any form of
consideration provided in exchange for the silence of an individual on issues relating to
workplace harassment, including but not limited to:
(A) Money;
(B) Stock, personal property or other items with a resale value;
(C) Severance pay or benefits for  an individual who resigned or was fired from a place
of employment without cause;
(D) The promise of a positive reference or  assistance in obtaining future employment in
a position in which the individual’s salary is paid for with public moneys;
(E) The promise of a bonus payment of moneys in addition to the individual’s salary;
(F) Alternative  work arrangements that have the effect of reducing the amount of work
required to be performed by the  individual, or of removing the individual from the workplace;
or
(G) Any agreement that terminates  the employment of the individual and includes a
waiver of past or future claims against the holder of public office, the public body or any
public employee.
(b) “Workplace harassment” means conduct that constitutes discrimination  prohibited
by ORS 659A.030, including conduct  that constitutes sexual assault as defined in ORS
181A.323.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 260.995 is amended to read:
260.995. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, following an investigation under
ORS 260.345, the Secretary of  State or Attorney General may impose a civil penalty not to exceed
$1,000 for each violation of  any provision of Oregon Revised Statutes relating to the conduct of any
election, any rule adopted by the secretary under ORS chapters  246 to 260 or any other matter
preliminary to or relating to an election, for which a civil penalty is not otherwise provided.
(2) The secretary or the Attorney General may impose a civil penalty not to exceed:
(a)(A) Except as  provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,  $1,000 plus the amount
converted to personal use for each violation of ORS 260.407;
(B) Two times the amount of the penalty provision for violating a nondisclosure  agree-
ment that is contained within each nondisclosure agreement entered into in violation  of ORS
260.407 or section 5 of this 2019 Act;  or
(b) $10,000 for each violation of  ORS 260.555, 260.558, 260.575, 260.695 (1) or 260.715 (1) or sec-
tion 1b, Article IV of the Oregon Constitution.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by this section, civil penalties under this section shall be  im-
posed as provided in ORS 183.745. In  addition to the requirements of ORS 183.745, the notice shall
include:
(a) A statement of the authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held; and
(b) If the person is an agency, corporation or an unincorporated  association, a statement that
such person must be represented by an attorney licensed in Oregon,  unless the person is a political
committee which may be represented by any officer identified in the most recent statement of or-
ganization filed with the filing officer.
(4) A  hearing on whether to impose a civil penalty and to consider circumstances in mitigation
shall be held by the secretary or Attorney General:
(a) Upon request of the person against  whom the penalty may be assessed, if the request is made
not later than the 20th  day after the date the person received notice sent under subsection (3) of
this section; or
(b) Upon the secretary’s or Attorney General’s own motion.
(5) The person against whom a penalty may be assessed  need not appear in person at a hearing
held under this section, but  instead may submit written testimony or other evidence, sworn to before
a notary public, to the secretary or Attorney General  for entry in the hearing record. The testimony
or other evidence  must be received by the secretary or Attorney General not later than three
business days before the day of the hearing.
Enrolled Senate Bill 478 (SB 478-B) Page 4
(6) All hearings under this section shall be held not later than 45 days  after the deadline for the
person against whom the penalty may be assessed to request a hearing. However, if requested by
the person against whom the penalty may be assessed, a hearing under subsection (4) of this  section
shall be held  not later than 60 days after the deadline for the person against whom the penalty may
be assessed to request a hearing.
(7) The  secretary or Attorney General shall issue an order not later than 90 days after a hearing
or after the deadline for requesting a hearing if no hearing is held.
(8) All penalties recovered under  this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited
to the General Fund.
(9) In the case of a  civil penalty imposed under this section for a violation of ORS 260.407, the
person against whom the penalty is assessed:
(a) Is personally responsible for the payment of the civil penalty;
(b) Shall pay the civil penalty from personal funds of the person; and
(c) May not pay the civil penalty  from contributions received by a candidate, a candidate’s
principal campaign committee, a political committee or a petition committee.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 244.350 is amended to read:
244.350. (1) The Oregon Government Ethics Commission  may impose civil penalties not to ex-
ceed:
(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) , (c) and (d)  [ and (c) ] of this subsection, $5,000 for vio-
lation of any provision of this chapter or any resolution adopted under ORS 244.160.
(b) $25,000 for violation of ORS 244.045.
(c) $10,000 for willfully violating ORS 244.040.
(d) Two times the amount of the penalty provision  for violating a nondisclosure agree-
ment that is contained within each nondisclosure agreement  entered into in violation of
section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the commission may impose civil
penalties not to exceed $1,000 for violation of any provision of ORS 192.660.
(b) A civil penalty  may not be imposed under this subsection if the violation occurred as a result
of the governing body of the public body acting upon the advice of the public body’s counsel.
(3) The commission may impose civil penalties  not to exceed $250 for violation of ORS 293.708.
A civil penalty imposed under this subsection is in addition to and not in lieu of a civil penalty  that
may be imposed under subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) The commission may impose civil penalties on a person who fails to  file the statement
required under ORS 244.050 or 244.217. In enforcing this subsection, the  commission is not required
to follow the procedures in ORS 244.260 before finding that a violation of ORS  244.050 or 244.217
has occurred.
(b) Failure to file the  required statement in timely fashion is prima facie evidence of a violation
of ORS 244.050 or 244.217.
(c) The commission may impose a civil penalty of $10 for each of the first 14 days the statement
is late beyond the date set by  law, or by the commission under ORS 244.050, and $50 for each day
thereafter. The maximum penalty that may be imposed under this subsection is $5,000.
(5) In lieu of or in conjunction with finding a violation of law or any resolution or imposing  a
civil penalty under this section, the commission may issue a  written letter of reprimand, explanation
or education.
SECTION 8.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 478 (SB 478-B) Page 5
Passed by Senate April 25, 2019
Repassed by Senate June 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 4, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 478 (SB 478-B) Page 6